District of Columbia statutes.
39-309

Retention of Council’s authority.

The Council of the District of Columbia retains the full right to repeal or amend this chapter at any time.

History

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 10, 27 DCR 2546

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2109.